Tennessee, session 114, HB2255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-3002, is amended by designating
the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new subsection (b):
(b) All vacancies must be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in the same
manner as the original appointments.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2255
012673
- 1 -